Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Alcoholic Beverages Generally

244.020.
Drinking or being under influence of alcoholic beverages in public place prohibited. [Repealed.]

244.030.
Soliciting orders — When prohibited.

No licensee under KRS Chapters 241 to 244 shall employ any canvasser or solicitor for the purpose of receiving an order from a consumer for any alcoholic beverages at the residence or place of business of the consumer, nor shall any such licensee receive or accept any order that has been solicited or received at the residence or place of business of the consumer.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the solicitation by a distiller, rectifier, brewer, or winery of an order from any wholesaler or distributor at the licensed premises of the wholesaler or distributor nor the solicitation by a wholesaler or distributor of an order from any retailer at the licensed premises.

History.

2554b-159: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 82, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 121, § 82, effective June 25, 2013.

244.040.
Sales for cash only.

A brewer or distributor shall not sell alcoholic beverages to any person in this state for any consideration except for cash paid at or before the time of delivery.

For purposes of this section, “cash” includes the sale of malt beverages by electronic transfers if the following conditions are met:

The use of electronic transfers shall be voluntary and shall be agreed to by the affected brewer, distributor, and retailer;

The brewer shall not pay or credit back in any way to the distributor any share of the cost that is attributable to the electronic transfer;

The distributor shall not pay or credit back in any way to the retailer any share of the cost that is attributable to the electronic fund transfer;

The transfer of funds shall be initiated by the brewer or the distributor;

The distributor may debit the retailer’s bank account for the exact amount due based on the amount of alcoholic beverages delivered;

Electronic fund transfers that are rejected or denied at the time of sale for any reason shall be treated in the same manner as checks drawn on insufficient funds; and

Each participating retail licensee and each distributor maintain accurate records of all electronic fund transfers in accordance with department statutes and administrative regulations.

A brewer or distributor shall not furnish or deliver any returnable bottled malt beverage without collecting a minimum container charge or deposit of sixty cents ($0.60) per case of twenty-four (24) twelve-ounce bottles or its equivalent in the same manner that the price of the malt beverage is collected.

This section shall not prohibit a licensee from crediting to a purchaser the actual prices charged for packages or containers returned by the original purchaser as a credit on any sale, or from refunding to any purchaser the amount paid by the purchaser for containers or as a deposit on containers when the title is retained by the vendor, if the containers or packages have been returned to the brewer or distributor.

No right of action shall exist to collect any claim for credit extended contrary to this section.

This section shall not apply to sales by wholesalers or distributors to licensees that are private clubs or voluntary associations.

History.

2554b-156: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 28, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 522, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 585, effective July 15, 2010.

244.050.
“Treating” prohibited — Exceptions.

A retail licensee shall not sell, give away, or deliver any alcoholic beverage at retail in any quantity for less than paid or current wholesale cost, except upon written request and approval by the administrators, pursuant to a bona fide “close out” sale, or as provided by KRS

243.0305

,

243.0307

,

243.155

, and

243.157

.

HISTORY:

2554b-183: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 381, § 5; 1998, ch. 121, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 182, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 15, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 20, § 11, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 179, § 12, effective January 1, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 586, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 83, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 21, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 89, effective June 29, 2017.

244.060.
Licensee to purchase from and sell only to persons authorized to sell or purchase.

No licensee shall purchase or agree to purchase any alcoholic beverages from any person within or without this state, who is not licensed to sell the beverages to the particular purchaser at the time of the agreement to sell, nor give any order for any alcoholic beverages to any person who is not a holder of a special agent’s or solicitor’s license if this license is required.

No licensee shall sell or agree to sell any alcoholic beverage to any person within or without this state who is not legally authorized to buy and receive the beverages at the time of the agreement to sell, nor secure any order for the sale of any alcoholic beverages through any person who is not the holder of a special agent’s or solicitor’s license.

HISTORY:

2554b-157; 2017 ch. 62, § 90, effective June 29, 2017.

244.070.
Sale to person not providing for his family prohibited. [Repealed]

History.

2554b-162; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

244.080.
Retail sales to certain persons prohibited — Affirmative defense in prosecution for selling to a minor.

A retail licensee, or the licensee’s agent, servant, or employee, shall not sell, give away, or deliver any alcoholic beverages, or procure or permit any alcoholic beverages to be sold, given away, possessed by, or delivered to:

A minor, except that in any prosecution for selling alcoholic beverages to a minor it shall be an affirmative defense that the sale was induced by the use of false, fraudulent, or altered identification papers or other documents and that the appearance and character of the purchaser were such that the purchaser’s age could not have been ascertained by any other means and that the purchaser’s appearance and character indicated strongly that the purchaser was of legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages. This evidence may be introduced either in mitigation of the charge or as a defense to the charge itself; or

A person who appears to a reasonable person to be actually or apparently under the influence of alcoholic beverages, controlled substances, other intoxicating substances, or any of these substances in combination, to the degree that the person may endanger any person or property, or unreasonably annoy persons in the vicinity.

HISTORY:

2554b-181: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 286, § 1; 1998, ch. 522, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 66, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 62, § 91, effective June 29, 2017.

244.083.
Licensee to display notice as to sale to minors.

Every retail licensee shall display at all times in a prominent place a printed card at least eight (8) inches by eleven (11) inches in size which shall show, in thirty (30) point or larger type, substantially as follows:

Persons under the age of twenty-one (21) are subject to a fine up to one hundred dollars ($100) if they:

Enter licensed premises to buy, or have served to them, alcoholic beverages.

Possess, purchase or attempt to purchase, or get another to purchase alcoholic beverages.

Misrepresent their age for the purpose of purchasing or obtaining alcoholic beverages.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 62, § 5.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Minors may enter premises that are licensed for the sale of alcoholic beverages for the purpose of dancing.

OAG 69-701

.

In a town where teenage drinking is a problem, a police plan involving an 18-year-old “under cover” agent who would be a willing volunteer, whose appearance and character would indicate his true age, and whose parents would have given their permission, would enter an establishment with a liquor license, in which a plain clothes officer would be present as an observer, ask to buy a drink or package goods, would have no identification if asked, would give his correct age if asked, would take a breathalizer test both before and after entering the suspected business, and would say nothing to mislead the seller into thinking he had proper identification elsewhere, would not be subject to a valid defense of entrapment, nor would it subject either the 18-year-old agent or the observing police officer to prosecution under this section, KRS 244.085(2) or (3), since both officer and agent would be engaged in a legitimate police investigation.

OAG 79-473

.

The intent of this section and KRS 244.085(2) is to discourage the purchase and possession of alcoholic beverages by minors for their personal consumption.

OAG 79-473

.

244.085.
Minors not to possess or purchase liquor nor to misrepresent age — Use of fraudulent identification — Prohibition against minors remaining on premises where alcoholic beverages sold.

A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not enter any premises licensed for the sale of alcoholic beverages for the purpose of purchasing or receiving any alcoholic beverages.

A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not possess for personal use or purchase or attempt to purchase or have another purchase for the person any alcoholic beverages. No person shall aid or assist any person under twenty-one (21) years of age in purchasing or being delivered or served any alcoholic beverages.

A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not misrepresent the person’s age for the purpose of inducing any licensee, or the licensee’s agent, servant, or employee, to sell or serve any alcoholic beverages to the underage person.

A person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall not use, or attempt to use any false, fraudulent, or altered identification card, paper, or any other document to purchase or attempt to purchase or otherwise obtain any alcoholic beverage.

Except as provided in KRS

244.090

, a licensee, or the licensee’s agents, servants, or employees shall not permit any person under twenty-one (21) years of age to remain on any premises where alcoholic beverages are sold by the drink or consumed on the premises, unless:

The usual and customary business of the licensee is a hotel, motel, restaurant, convention center, convention hotel complex, racetrack, simulcast facility, golf course, private club, park, fair, church, school, athletic complex, athletic arena, theater, small farm winery, distillery, brewery, winery, convenience store, grocery store, drug store, entertainment destination center, licensed APC premises, live music or other entertainment or public facility, or any other business type, as determined by the board through the promulgation of administrative regulations, whose operations allow it to adequately monitor and prevent alcohol sales to minors; or

All alcoholic beverage inventory is kept in a separate, locked department at all times when minors are on the premises.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a licensee or the licensee’s agent, servant, or employee shall not allow any person under the age of twenty-one (21) to remain on any premises that sells alcoholic beverages by the package unless the underage person is accompanied by a parent or guardian or the usual and customary business of the establishment is a convenience store, grocery store, drugstore, or similar establishment.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a person under the age of twenty-one (21) shall not remain on any premises that sells alcoholic beverages by the package unless the person under the age of twenty-one (21) is accompanied by a parent or guardian or the usual and customary business of the establishment is a convenience store, grocery store, drugstore, or similar establishment.

A violation of subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or (7) of this section shall be deemed a status offense if committed by a person under the age of eighteen (18) and shall be under the jurisdiction of the juvenile session of the District Court or the family division of the Circuit Court, as appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 62, §§ 1 to 4; 1972, ch. 286, § 2; 1998, ch. 522, § 18, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 58, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2008, ch. 87, § 22, effective July 15, 2008; 2009, ch. 66, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 587, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 80, § 22, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 92, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 102, § 19, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2009). The Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in subsection (6)(d) of this statute under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1)(h).

244.087.
Minor may stock, arrange displays, and sell malt beverages. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 389, § 1; 1998, ch. 522, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

244.090.
Persons whom licensees may not employ — Exceptions.

A person holding any license shall not knowingly employ in connection with the licensed business any person who:

Has been convicted of any felony within the last two (2) years;

Has been twice convicted of any misdemeanor or offense directly or indirectly attributable to the use of alcoholic beverages within the last two (2) years;

For the purposes of selling and serving alcoholic beverages, is under the age of twenty (20) years, unless the person employed is at least eighteen (18) years of age and under the supervision of a person twenty (20) years of age or older; or

Within two (2) years prior to the date of the person’s employment, has had any license issued under KRS Chapters 241 to 244 or under any other act or ordinance relating to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, or transportation of alcoholic beverages revoked for cause.

The provisions of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section shall not apply if the employee’s duties do not involve the sale, service, delivery, or traffic in alcoholic beverages at the licensed premises.

A person under the age of twenty (20) years of age whose employment is authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall not have duties that include bartending or any activities listed in KRS 529.010(3).

A person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age whose employment does not include the sale or service of alcoholic beverages may work in the warehouse of a wholesaler or distributor if there is an employee on the premises who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

Violation of this section shall subject both employer and employee to penalties provided in this chapter and shall be cause for revocation of license.

History.

2554b-155: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, § 6, 15; 1974, ch. 389, § 2; 1978, ch. 194, § 19, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 208, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 467, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 522, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2012, ch. 125, § 7, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 121, § 84, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 93, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

244.100.
Female may be employed only as waitress, cashier or usher. [Repealed.]

244.105.
Gift card for alcoholic beverages to be redeemed only by persons 21 and older.

No person under the age of twenty-one (21) may redeem a gift card or any portion of a gift card for the purchase of alcoholic beverages. A person holding a license under KRS

243.030

or

243.040

may redeem a gift card for the purchase of alcoholic beverages if the person presenting the card is twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 28, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

244.110.
Retail premises to furnish clear view from sidewalk or entrance.

The entrance of any premises for which a quota retail package license or a quota retail drink license has been issued shall be of clear glass and permit an unobstructed view. The premises shall be erected and maintained to furnish a clear view of the premises from the sidewalk, or, if the premises are not on the street level, from the entrance. No partition, box, stall, screen, curtain, or other device shall obstruct the view or the general observation of persons, but partitions, subdivisions, or panels that are not higher than forty-eight (48) inches from the floor shall not be construed as obstructing the view or the general observation of persons.

HISTORY:

2554b-176: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 121, § 27, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 94, effective June 29, 2017.

244.120.
Retail premises not to be disorderly — Acts constituting disorderly behavior.

A retail licensee, a patron, or the licensee’s agents, servants, or employees shall not cause, suffer, or permit the licensed premises to be disorderly.

Acts which constitute disorderly premises consist of causing, suffering, or permitting patrons, the licensee, or the licensee’s servants, agents, or employees to cause public inconvenience, annoyance, or alarm, or create a risk through:

Engaging in fighting or in violent, tumultuous, or threatening behavior;

Making unreasonable noise;

Refusing to obey an official order to disperse issued to maintain public safety in dangerous proximity to a fire, hazard, or other emergency;

Creating a hazardous or physically offensive condition by any act that serves no legitimate purpose;

Creating a public nuisance;

Engaging in criminal activity that would constitute a capital offense, felony, or misdemeanor; or

Failing to maintain the minimum health, fire, safety, or sanitary standards established by the state or a local government, or by state administrative regulations, for the licensed premises.

History.

2554b-180, 3490-14: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, §§ 8, 17; repealed in part 1944, ch. 154, § 25 and ch. 173, § 15; 1978, ch. 194, § 20, effective June 17, 1978; 2013, ch. 121, § 85, effective June 25, 2013.

244.125.
Prohibition against possession of loaded firearm in room where alcoholic beverages are being sold by the drink.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no person shall be in possession of a loaded, as defined in KRS

237.060

, firearm while actually within the room where alcoholic beverages are being sold by the drink of a building on premises licensed to sell distilled spirits and wine at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises pursuant to KRS Chapter 243.

This section shall not apply to the owner manager, or employee of licensed premises, law enforcement officers, or special local peace officers commissioned pursuant to KRS

61.360

.

This section shall not apply to a bona fide restaurant open to the general public having dining facilities for not less than fifty (50) persons and which receives less than fifty percent (50%) of its annual food and beverage receipts from the dining facilities by the sale of alcohol.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as permitting the carrying of a concealed deadly weapon in violation of KRS

527.020

.

Any firearm possessed in violation of this section shall be subject to forfeiture and shall be disposed of pursuant to KRS

237.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 396, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 119, § 2, effective October 1, 1996; 2012, ch. 125, § 8, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 22, § 21, effective July 15, 2014.

244.130.
Advertising to comply with regulations of board — Types of advertising not prohibited.

A licensee may advertise or cause to be advertised in any manner any product that the licensee is licensed to manufacture or sell unless prohibited by administrative regulations promulgated by the board.

The board shall not prohibit the following forms of advertising:

Advertising in newspapers, magazines, or periodicals having a general circulation;

Promotional advertising on radio or television limited to no more than the name of the licensee and the products the licensee is permitted to manufacture or sell;

Promotional advertising containing the names of establishments or products displayed on uniforms or equipment of sporting teams;

Promotional advertising mailed or delivered to a consumer’s residence; or

A distiller from providing visitors who are twenty-one (21) years of age or older, in conjunction with a distillery tour or an event conducted by a bona fide church or charitable organization, free:

Consumer-branded nonalcoholic novelty items whose actual retail cost does not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) per item; and

Production by-products.

HISTORY:

2554b-164: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 21, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 58, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 121, § 28, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 59, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2016 ch. 80, § 23, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 95, effective June 29, 2017.

244.140.
Advertising brands by retailers prohibited. [Repealed.]

244.150.
Licensee to keep records.

Each licensee shall keep and maintain upon the licensed premises, or make readily available upon request of the department or the Department of Revenue, adequate books and records of all transactions involved in the manufacture, distribution, or sale of alcoholic beverages, in the manner required by administrative regulations of the department and the Department of Revenue.

History.

2554b-167, 4281c-21: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 26; 1998, ch. 121, § 29, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 661, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 588, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 96, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 80, § 13, effective July 15, 2020.

244.160.
Presence of alcoholic beverage raises presumption of intention to sell.

Whenever any alcoholic beverage, in whatever quantity, is found on any business premises within this state, a prima facie presumption shall arise that the alcoholic beverage was upon the premises for the purpose of sale.

History.

2554b-166.

244.165.
Unlawful sale and shipment by out-of-state seller directly to a Kentucky consumer — Penalty.

Except as provided in KRS

243.027

to

243.029

, it shall be unlawful for any person in the business of selling alcoholic beverages in another state or country to deliver or ship or cause to be delivered or shipped any alcoholic beverage directly to any Kentucky consumer who does not hold a valid wholesaler or distributor license issued by the Commonwealth.

A licensed transporter or common carrier making deliveries or shipments pursuant to this section shall deliver or ship directly to consumers over twenty-one (21) years of age in packages clearly marked “Alcoholic Beverages, adult signature (21 years of age or over) required,” and shall request adult-signature-only service from the carrier. A licensed common carrier shall not knowingly ship unlicensed alcoholic beverage shipments into the Commonwealth. Deliveries or shipments of alcoholic beverages shall only be made into areas of the state in which alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold. When the shipper requests adult-signature-only service, it shall be a violation for a common carrier not to inspect government-issued identification for proof of age. No properly licensed common carrier or any of its employees acting on behalf of a consignor shall be liable for a violation of any provision of KRS

242.250

,

242.260

, or

242.270

prohibiting the delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages into areas of the state in which alcoholic beverages are not lawfully sold.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall, for the first offense, be mailed a certified letter by the department ordering that person to cease and desist any deliveries or shipments of alcoholic beverages to Kentucky residents, and the department shall mail a copy of the certified letter to the licensing authority where the person is located. Any subsequent violations may result in further legal action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 72, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 179, § 2, effective January 1, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 589, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 164, § 7, effective April 13, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 21, effective July 15, 2020.

244.167.
Unlawful acts relating to wholesalers or distributors.

It is unlawful:

For any distiller, rectifier, winery, brewer, or importer to solicit, accept, or fill any order for any alcoholic beverage from any wholesaler or distributor in the Commonwealth of Kentucky unless the supplier is the primary source of supply for the brand of alcoholic beverage sold or sought to be sold;

For any wholesaler, distributor, or any other licensee in this Commonwealth to order, purchase, or receive any alcoholic beverage from any supplier unless the supplier is the primary source of supply for the brand ordered, purchased, or received;

For a retailer to order, purchase, or receive any alcoholic beverage from any source other than any of the following:

A wholesaler or distributor who has purchased the brand from the primary source of supply; or

A wholesaler or distributor who is the designated representative of the primary source of supply in this Commonwealth and who has purchased alcoholic beverages from the designated representative of the primary source of supply within or without this Commonwealth; and

For alcoholic beverages to be transported from a wholesaler’s or distributor’s warehouse within twenty-four (24) hours of the time they are unloaded.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board may suspend for a period not to exceed one (1) year the license of any wholesaler, distributor, or retailer who violates the provisions of this section.

Upon determination by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board that a primary source of supply has violated the provisions of this section, no wholesaler, distributor, or retailer may accept any shipment of alcoholic beverages from the primary source of supply for a period of one (1) year.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 72, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 590, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 86, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 97, effective June 29, 2017.

244.170.
Apparatus for unlawful manufacture prohibited.

No person shall buy, bargain, sell, loan, own, possess or knowingly transport any apparatus designed for the unlawful manufacture of alcoholic beverages.

History.

2554b-67.

244.180.
Contraband defined.

The following property, even though found and seized in dry territory, is contraband:

Any apparatus commonly used or intended to be used in the manufacture of alcoholic beverages and not registered in the office of a collector of internal revenue for the United States. The burden of proof that the apparatus is properly registered shall be on the defendant.

Any material, equipment, implements, devices, firearms, and other property used or intended for use directly and immediately in connection with the unlawful traffic in alcoholic beverages.

Any alcoholic beverages in the possession of anyone not entitled by law to possess them.

Any alcoholic beverages in a container of a size prohibited by law or prohibited to the particular party in whose possession they are found.

Any vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft in which any person is illegally possessing or transporting alcoholic beverages. “Illegally possessing” means and includes the holding of any alcoholic beverages unless lawfully acquired and intended for lawful uses.

HISTORY:

2554b-151: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 132, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2017 ch. 62, § 98, effective June 29, 2017.

244.190.
Seizure of contraband — Destruction upon conviction of defendant.

Any peace officers, state administrators, and investigators of the department may, upon probable cause, without warrant seize contraband regardless of whether it is in dry territory or not, and hold it subject to the order of the court before which the owner or one in possession of the contraband has been charged with violation of KRS Chapter 242 or KRS

243.020

. Upon conviction of the defendant, the court shall enter an order for the destruction of all contraband property, except firearms or ammunition, included in KRS 244.180(1), (2), (3), and (4). Contraband firearms and ammunition shall be transferred to the Department of Kentucky State Police for disposition as provided in KRS

500.090

.

HISTORY:

2554b-151: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 132, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 368, § 12, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 273, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 591, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 99, effective June 29, 2017.

244.195.
Title to contraband seized in dry territory to be vested in appropriate court — Destruction of contraband upon conviction of defendant.

Title to seized contraband included in KRS 244.180(1), (2), (3), and (4) shall be vested in the appropriate court within whose jurisdiction the seizure occurred, irrespective of whether the contraband was seized by peace officers of the city or county or state administrators or investigators of the department, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

242.380

.

The court shall order the sheriff for the county in which the contraband included in subsection (1) of this section was seized to destroy the contraband, except firearms or ammunition, upon conviction of the defendant.

Contraband firearms and ammunition shall be transferred to the Department of Kentucky State Police for disposition as provided in KRS

500.090

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956 (4th Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, §§ 1, 2; 1962, ch. 104, § 1; 1984, ch. 132, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 368, § 13, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 274, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 592, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 100, effective June 29, 2017.

244.200.
Rights of owner or lienor as to contraband — Disposition of contraband.

Contraband property included in KRS

244.180

shall be subject to the right of any owner or lienor, whose lien is valid and of record, to intervene and establish the owner or lienor’s rights in the property by proving that the property was being used in connection with traffic in alcoholic beverages without the knowledge, consent, or approval of the owner or lienor.

If the owner of the property proves the owner’s lack of knowledge, consent, or approval, the court shall order the property restored to the owner; or

If the lienor proves the lienor’s lack of knowledge, consent, or approval, the court shall order a sale of the property at public auction, unless an agreement is made between the lienor and the board, which shall not become final until it has been approved by the court. The board may deliver any property found to be contraband to a lienor whose claim has been established by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, upon payment to the board of the difference between the fair market value of the seized property and the recorded claim of the lienor.

Where an agreement has been made between the lienor and the board and approved by the court, a public auction shall not be required. If an agreement is not entered into between the board and the lienor or approved by the court, and a public auction is required, the public auction shall be conducted by the sheriff of the county in which the property is seized. The sheriff shall receive and be allowed the same fees as allowed for sales under execution.

The expenses of keeping and selling the property, and the amount of all valid recorded liens that are established by intervention as being bona fide, shall be paid out of the proceeds of the sales, whether they are private or public. The balance shall be paid into the State Treasury and be credited to the general fund.

If the defendant is acquitted, no property seized as contraband in connection with the arrest of the defendant shall be ordered returned or restored unless the person from whose possession the property was taken proves that the person was in lawful possession of the property, and if no other person appears and proves that the other person owns the property or has a valid recorded lien on the property and that the property was being used without that person’s knowledge and consent, title shall vest in the board at the end of ninety (90) days.

If the owners or lienholders of any contraband seized by state administrators or investigators of the department or turned over to the department by other officials, cannot be located within ninety (90) days, and during that time fail to appear and claim the contraband, or if the owner or lienholder appears and agrees, title to the contraband shall immediately vest in the board, which may sell the contraband at a private sale.

HISTORY:

2554b-151: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 132, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 593, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 101, effective June 29, 2017.